District of Columbia statutes.
7-601

Standard.

An individual who has sustained either: (1) irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions; or (2) irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem; is dead. A determination of death must be made in accordance with accepted medical standards.

Feb. 25, 1982, D.C. Law 4-68, § 2, 28 DCR 5045
This section is referenced in § 19-505.
1981 Ed., § 6-2401.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1 of the Uniform Determination of Death Act.